Washington statutes.
RCW 33.36.020

Purchase at discount of accounts or certificates.

Any director, officer, agent, attorney, or employee of an association who, directly or indirectly, shall purchase at a discount any savings account in the association or any certificate or debenture of any segregation corporation holding assets formerly held by the association shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1945 c 235 s 88; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-207. Prior: 1933 c 183 ss 62, 101.]